Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Sec. 13.16.005.
Devolution of estate at death; restrictions.

The power of a person to leave property by will, and the rights of creditors, devisees, and heirs to the property are subject to the restrictions and limitations contained in AS 13.06 —
AS 13.36 to facilitate the prompt settlement of estates. Upon the death of a person, that person’s real and personal property devolves to the persons to whom it is devised by the last will or to those indicated as substitutes for them in cases involving lapse, renunciation, or other circumstances affecting the devolution of testate estates, or in the absence of testamentary disposition, to the heirs, or to those indicated as substitutes for them in cases involving renunciation or other circumstances affecting devolution of intestate estates, subject to homestead allowance, exempt property and family allowance, to rights of creditors, elective share of the surviving spouse, and to administration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.010.
Necessity of order of probate for will.

Except as provided in AS

13.16.680

, to be effective to prove the transfer of property or to nominate an executor, a will must be declared to be valid by an order of informal probate by the registrar or by an adjudication of probate by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 19, ch. 75, SLA 1996, provides, in regard to the amendment of this section by § 4, ch. 75, SLA 1996, as follows: “(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section or in this Act,

“(1) this Act applies to the governing instruments executed by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997;

“(2) this Act applies to a proceeding in court pending on or begun on or after January 1, 1997, regardless of the time of the death of the decedent, except to the extent that in the opinion of the court the former procedure should be made applicable in a particular case in the interest of justice or because of the infeasibility of applying the procedures of this Act;

“(3) an act done before January 1, 1997, in any proceeding and an accrued right are not impaired by this Act; if a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that began to run under a statute before January 1, 1997, the provisions of the statute apply to that right on and after January 1, 1997;

“(4) a rule of construction or presumption provided in this Act, applies to governing instruments executed before January 1, 1997, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

“(b) AS

13.33.301

,

13.33.302

,

13.33.303

,

13.33.304

,

13.33.305

,

13.33.306

,

13.33.307

,

13.33.308

,

13.33.309

, and

13.33.310

, enacted by sec. 12 of this Act, apply to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before, on, or after January 1, 1997, by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997.

“(c) In this section, ‘court,’ ‘governing instrument,’ and ‘proceeding’ have the meanings given in AS

13.06.050

, amended by sec. 2 of this Act.”

Sec. 13.16.015.
Necessity of appointment for administration.

Except as otherwise provided in AS 13.21, to acquire the powers and undertake the duties and liabilities of a personal representative of a decedent, a person must be appointed by order of the court or registrar, qualify, and be issued letters. Administration of an estate is commenced by the issuance of letters.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A foreign personal representative who has filed an authenticated copy of his letters of appointment with the local court need only present copies of the domiciliary personal representative. August 14, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 13.16.020.
Claims against decedent; necessity of administration.

A proceeding to enforce a claim against the estate of a decedent or the decedent’s successors may not be revived or commenced before the appointment of a personal representative.
After the appointment and until distribution, all proceedings and actions to enforce a claim against the estate are governed by the procedure prescribed by this chapter.
After distribution a creditor whose claim has not been barred may recover from the distributees as provided in AS

13.16.635

or from a former personal representative individually liable as provided in AS

13.16.640

.
This section has no application to a proceeding by a secured creditor of the decedent to enforce a right to the security except as to any deficiency judgment that might be sought in the proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.025.
Proceedings affecting devolution and administration; jurisdiction of subject matter.

Persons interested in decedents’ estates may apply to the registrar for determination in the informal proceedings provided in this chapter, and may petition the court for orders in formal proceedings within the court’s jurisdiction including those described in this chapter. The court has exclusive jurisdiction of formal proceedings to determine how decedents’ estates subject to the laws of this state are to be administered, expended, and distributed. The court has concurrent jurisdiction of any other action or proceeding concerning a succession or to which an estate, through a personal representative, may be a party, including actions to determine title to property alleged to belong to the estate, and of any action or proceeding in which property distributed by a personal representative or its value is sought to be subjected to rights of creditors or successors of the decedent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of the first sentence substituted “including those described in this chapter” for “including but not limited to those described in this chapter”, and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 13.16.030.
Proceedings within the exclusive jurisdiction of court; service; jurisdiction over persons.

In proceedings within the exclusive jurisdiction of the court where notice is required by AS 13.06
—
AS 13.36 or by rule, and in proceedings to construe probated wills or determine heirs which proceedings concern estates that have not been and cannot at the time of these proceedings be opened for administration, interested persons may be bound by the orders of the court in respect to property in or subject to the laws of this state by notice in conformity with AS

13.06.110

.
An order is binding as to all who are given notice of the proceeding though fewer than all interested persons are notified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 154 SLA 1976)

Sec. 13.16.035.
Scope of proceedings; proceedings independent; exception.

Unless supervised administration as described in AS

13.16.215

—

13.16.235

is involved,

each proceeding before the court or registrar is independent of any other proceeding involving the same estate;

petitions for formal orders of the court may combine various requests for relief in a single proceeding if the orders sought may be finally granted without delay; except as required for proceedings that are particularly described by other sections of this chapter, no petition is defective because it fails to embrace all matters that might then be the subject of a final order;

proceedings for probate of wills or adjudications of no will may be combined with proceedings for appointment of personal representatives; and

a proceeding for appointment of a personal representative is concluded by an order making or declining the appointment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.040.
Probate, testacy, and appointment proceedings; ultimate time limit.

An informal probate or appointment proceeding or formal testacy or appointment proceeding, other than a proceeding to probate a will previously probated at the testator’s domicile and appointment proceedings relating to an estate in which there has been a prior appointment, may not be commenced more than three years after the decedent’s death, except

if a previous proceeding was dismissed because of doubt about the fact of the decedent’s death, appropriate probate, appointment, or testacy proceedings may be maintained at any time after the dismissal upon a finding that the decedent’s death occurred before the initiation of the previous proceeding and the applicant or petitioner has not delayed unduly in initiating the subsequent proceeding;

appropriate probate, appointment, or testacy proceedings may be maintained in relation to the estate of an absent, disappeared, or missing person for whose estate a conservator has been appointed, at any time within three years after the conservator becomes able to establish the death of the protected person;

a proceeding to contest an informally probated will and to secure appointment of the person with legal priority for appointment in the event the contest is successful, may be commenced within the later of 12 months from the informal probate or three years from the decedent’s death;

an informal appointment or a formal testacy or appointment proceeding may be commenced after the three years if proceedings concerning the succession or estate administration have not occurred within the three-year period after the decedent’s death, but the personal representative may not possess estate assets as provided in AS

13.16.380

beyond that necessary to confirm title to the assets in the successors to the estate and claims other than expenses of administration may not be presented against the estate; and

a formal testacy proceeding may be commenced at any time after three years from the decedent’s death for the purpose of establishing an instrument to direct or control the ownership of property passing or distributable after the decedent’s death from a person other than the decedent when the property is to be appointed by the terms of the decedent’s will or is to pass or be distributed as a part of the decedent’s estate or its transfer is otherwise to be controlled by the terms of the decedent’s will.

The limitations in (a) of this section do not apply to proceedings to construe probated wills or determine heirs of an intestate.

In cases under (a)(1) or (2) of this section, the date on which a testacy or appointment proceeding is properly commenced is considered to be the date of the decedent’s death for purposes of other limitations provisions of AS 13.06 — AS 13.36 that relate to the date of death.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 19, ch. 75, SLA 1996, provides, in regard to the amendment of this section by § 5, ch. 75, SLA 1996, as follows: “(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section or in this Act,

“(1) this Act applies to the governing instruments executed by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997;

“(2) this Act applies to a proceeding in court pending on or begun on or after January 1, 1997, regardless of the time of the death of the decedent, except to the extent that in the opinion of the court the former procedure should be made applicable in a particular case in the interest of justice or because of the infeasibility of applying the procedures of this Act;

“(3) an act done before January 1, 1997, in any proceeding and an accrued right are not impaired by this Act; if a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that began to run under a statute before January 1, 1997, the provisions of the statute apply to that right on and after January 1, 1997;

“(4) a rule of construction or presumption provided in this Act, applies to governing instruments executed before January 1, 1997, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

“(b) AS

13.33.301

,

13.33.302

,

13.33.303

,

13.33.304

,

13.33.305

,

13.33.306

,

13.33.307

,

13.33.308

,

13.33.309

, and

13.33.310

, enacted by sec. 12 of this Act, apply to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before, on, or after January 1, 1997, by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997.

“(c) In this section, ‘court,’ ‘governing instrument,’ and ‘proceeding’ have the meanings given in AS

13.06.050

, amended by sec. 2 of this Act.”

Sec. 13.16.045.
Statutes of limitation on decedent’s cause of action.

No statute of limitation running on a cause of action belonging to a decedent that had not been barred as of the date of death shall apply to bar a cause of action surviving the decedent’s death sooner than four months after death.
A cause of action that, but for this section, would have been barred less than four months after death, is barred after four months unless tolled.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)